Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201460-474
Operator's or driver's license, defined.

Operator's or driver's license shall mean any license or permit to operate
a motor vehicle issued under the laws of this state, including:

(1) Any replacement license or instruction permit;

(2) The privilege of any person to drive a motor vehicle whether such
person holds a valid license;

(3) Any nonresident's operating privilege which shall mean the privilege
conferred upon a nonresident by the laws of this state pertaining to the operation
of a motor vehicle in this state by such person or the use in this state of
a vehicle owned by such person;

(4) An employment driving permit issued as provided by sections 60-4,129
and 60-4,130; and

(5) A medical hardship driving permit issued as provided by sections
60-4,130.01 and 60-4,130.02.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 24;

Laws 1993, LB 105, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 69;

Laws 2014, LB777, § 2.